external_dictionaries/vdemir/tr_TR.aff
LANG tr_TR
SET UTF-8
TRY İiIıŞşÇçĞğÜüÖö-qwertyuopasdfghjklzxcvbnmQWERTYUOPASDFGHJKLZXCVBNM'
FLAG num

SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 0 ılmamakla .
SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 0 nulmazlığına .
SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 tırabildiği .
SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 0 leyicilerini .
SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 0 ştıran .
SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 0 mizden .
SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 0 leyicilerine .
SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 0 ttiğini .
SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 melerindense .
SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 0 ttiğine .
SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 undakilerin .
SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 lemediler .
SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 0 ümlerinde .
SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 0 leşememesinden .
SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 0 lenmeyen .
SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 0 ılabilmekte .
SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 0 laşımından .
SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 0 ebileceğimi .
SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 0 malarındandı .
SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 0 ebileceğime .
SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 0 layabilseydik .
SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 0 laşmadıklarından .
SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 0 ulmuşu .
SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 0 şabileceklerinden .
SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 0 lamamakla .
SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 0 ışlarını .
SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 0 tırsın .
SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 0 lendirenlerin .
SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 0 ndeyken .
SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 0 yabilenleri .
SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 0 lanamamış .
SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 0 ebileceğini .
SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 inkiyle .
SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 0 dırarak .
SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 0 tiyordu .
SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 ebileceğine .
SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0 ımların .
SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 leneyim .
SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 0 üklüğünün .
SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 0 dırılmanın .
SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 0 turulmaları .
SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 0 leştirilebiliyor .
SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 0 üşlerindeki .
SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 0 temeyeceklerini .
SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 0 nemediğinde .
SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 0 durmayacaklarını .
SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 0 mamışlar .
SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 0 temeyeceklerine .
SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 0 dirilemeyeceğini .
SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 0 leştirildiklerini .
SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 0 ılışın .
SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 0 lendirmelerine .
SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 0 ılışım .
SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 0 dırmalısınız .
SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 0 leşmişlerdi .
SFX 154 N 1
SFX 154 0 dıydı .
SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 0 lanırsınız .
SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 0 lendirmelerini .
SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 0 leyiciler .
SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 0 tırdığının .
SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 0 sallaştırılmış .
SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 0 ılışıdır .
SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 0 e .
SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 0 a .
SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 0 ulamayan .
SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 0 n .
SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 0 laştığınızda .
SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 0 ıştırdık .
SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 0 ülmeyecek .
SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 0 duramıyor .
SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 0 m .
SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 0 ttiğimi .
SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 0 i .
SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 0 lendirmeyen .
SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 0 dirilemeyeceğine .
SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 0 imiyse .
SFX 176 N 1
SFX 176 0 u .
SFX 177 N 1
SFX 177 0 t .
SFX 178 N 1
SFX 178 0 şabildiklerini .
SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 0 r .
SFX 179 N 1
SFX 179 0 temediği .
SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 0 ülebildi .
SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 0 leştirilmelerinde .
SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 0 lılaştırdığı .
SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 0 amayışlarına .
SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 0 'mızı .
SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 0 mışına .
SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 0 ışsın .
SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 0 ışmanın .
SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 0 amayışlarını .
SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 0 tüldüğünden .
SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 0 tamamışım .
SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 0 tirdiklerini .
SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 0 latılacak .
SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 0 laşılamayacak .
SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 0 tirdiklerine .
SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 0 tılabilecektir .
SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 0 lenmeyin .
SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 0 lenmeyip .
SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 0 sındakine .
SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 0 lenmeyiz .
SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 0 leyicilik .
SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 0 layabileceğimizi .
SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 0 ımızsınız .
SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 0 tırdığınız .
SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 0 sındakini .
SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 0 iveriyorlar .
SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 0 cülüğünü .
SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 0 ndirmeleri .
SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 0 ışmanız .
SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 0 timin .
SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 0 unuzda .
SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 0 leşmesinin .
SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 0 nemediğinin .
SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 0 tılmamalıdır .
SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 0 lenememişler .
SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 0 ulmuşken .
SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 0 üydüm .
SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 0 işemeyecek .
SFX 219 N 1
SFX 219 0 leşimindeki .
SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 0 meseydim .
SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 0 sellerin .
SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 0 leşemediklerinden .
SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 0 lamaktır .
SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 0 meseydin .
SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 leştiremeyeceğinin .
SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 diremedik .
SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 0 mazlarından .
SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 laştıramazlar .
SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 0 mayacağımıza .
SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 0 diremedim .
SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 leyememesi .
SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 0 tebilecekleri .
SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 meseydik .
SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 tmasınlar .
SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 lenmeyeceğinin .
SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 edursun .
SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 0 lerindeki .
SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 celerinden .
SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 0 celerden .
SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 işimleri .
SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 lısıyla .
SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 imindekileri .
SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 direceklerinin .
SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 0 ılığını .
SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 0 laşamamazlıkları .
SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 0 nmişliği .
SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 0 amayacağındaydı .
SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 0 lanmasın .
SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 0 larındansa .
SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 amıyormuş .
SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 cımızda .
SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 0 şmışlar .
SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 cülerine .
SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 0 dıyor .
SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 0 ücülüğün .
SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 cülerini .
SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 lısıydı .
SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 0 ışıldığını .
SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0 şılamayacağının .
SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 ü .
SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 laştırıyor .
SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 0 umdaki .
SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 0 leştirilemezdi .
SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 0 leşmişlerin .
SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 0 laştırırsak .
SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 0 lamamakta .
SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 0 landırılabileceğini .
SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 0 leşebileceğine .
SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 0 şemeyeceğine .
SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 0 leşebileceğini .
SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 0 tılanın .
SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 0 ştırmışlardı .
SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 0 şemeyeceğini .
SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 0 lanmıyorlar .
SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 0 tıcıların .
SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 0 tılanlar .
SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 0 diniz .
SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 0 ılmamakta .
SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 0 laştırabilmek .
SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 0 laştırmakla .
SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 0 ı .
SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 0 tileceğini .
SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 0 diremeden .
SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 0 dırılamadı .
SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 0 iştiğinden .
SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 0 tileceğine .
SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 0 lanamamışlar .
SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 0 leyemediler .
SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 0 tirebildiklerini .
SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 0 tılmış .
SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 0 latabilir .
SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 0 nacaklardı .
SFX 293 N 1
SFX 293 0 mesindendir .
SFX 295 N 1
SFX 295 0 çılarımızın .
SFX 294 N 1
SFX 294 0 ilemeyerek .
SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 0 liğime .
SFX 298 N 1
SFX 298 0 uydular .
SFX 297 N 1
SFX 297 0 laştırabildiğini .
SFX 299 N 1
SFX 299 0 landırılabileceğine .
SFX 300 N 1
SFX 300 0 laştırabildiğine .
SFX 303 N 1
SFX 303 0 ılmışlığını .
SFX 302 N 1
SFX 302 0 mışsan .
SFX 301 N 1
SFX 301 0 layacakların .
SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305 0 mışsam .
SFX 304 N 1
SFX 304 0 layabilenlerin .
SFX 306 N 1
SFX 306 0 mışsak .
SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 0 iyordur .
SFX 308 N 1
SFX 308 0 lıyım .
SFX 309 N 1
SFX 309 0 iyordun .
SFX 310 N 1
SFX 310 0 iyordum .
SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 0 ş .
SFX 311 N 1
SFX 311 0 lenmeyecekleri .
SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 0 liğimi .
SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 0 iyorduk .
SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 0 lanabileceğine .
SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 0 sindekiler .
SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 0 ıştırılamayacak .
SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 0 lanabileceğini .
SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 0 lendirmeyle .
SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 0 lıyız .
SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 0 ilmemiştir .
SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 0 nına .
SFX 323 N 1
SFX 323 0 liğine .
SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 0 leyebileceğimiz .
SFX 325 N 1
SFX 325 0 iysen .
SFX 326 N 1
SFX 326 0 işmişlerdi .
SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 0 işlerden .
SFX 328 N 1
SFX 328 0 lanıyormuş .
SFX 330 N 1
SFX 330 0 nmamasında .
SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 0 şmamasına .
SFX 331 N 1
SFX 331 0 nilince .
SFX 333 N 1
SFX 333 0 laşmasın .
SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 0 lardakilerden .
SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 0 mişlik .
SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 0 liğini .
SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 0 amayacağıdır .
SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 0 tmamasına .
SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 0 latacağını .
SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 0 uluğunda .
SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 0 tırmanız .
SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 0 sallıklarına .
SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 0 tırmanın .
SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 0 ilmemenin .
SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 0 larımda .
SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 0 isin .
SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 0 meyeceksiniz .
SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 0 dürdüklerine .
SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 0 dürdüklerini .
SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 0 nebilmelidir .
SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 0 'ıdır .
SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 0 emediği .
SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 0 lılıkları .
SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 0 tırılmamıştır .
SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 0 nımın .
SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 0 ıncaya .
SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 culuğundaki .
SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 0 mayacağımızı .
SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 yıcıların .
SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 0 mizdir .
SFX 360 N 1
SFX 360 0 ıştırmalar .
SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 0 lamaktalar .
SFX 362 N 1
SFX 362 0 namayarak .
SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 0 esin .
SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 0 esim .
SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 0 laşılmaz .
SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 0 sallıklarını .
SFX 366 N 1
SFX 366 0 lıydınız .
SFX 368 N 1
SFX 368 0 dakilerden .
SFX 370 N 1
SFX 370 0 nmişken .
SFX 369 N 1
SFX 369 0 ştıklarının .
SFX 371 N 1
SFX 371 0 tuğunuz .
SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 0 çuğum .
SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 0 şmazlar .
SFX 374 N 1
SFX 374 0 tuğunun .
SFX 375 N 1
SFX 375 0 nmayarak .
SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 0 'dekilerin .
SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 0 ışımları .
SFX 378 N 1
SFX 378 0 ınızdakileri .
SFX 380 N 1
SFX 380 0 ememişimdir .
SFX 379 N 1
SFX 379 0 lenmemize .
SFX 382 N 1
SFX 382 0 likteydi .
SFX 381 N 1
SFX 381 0 dıramamanın .
SFX 383 N 1
SFX 383 0 lılarından .
SFX 384 N 1
SFX 384 0 lendirilemeyeceğinin .
SFX 385 N 1
SFX 385 0 turabileceği .
SFX 387 N 1
SFX 387 0 dirilmesidir .
SFX 386 N 1
SFX 386 0 lenmemizi .
SFX 388 N 1
SFX 388 0 çiniz .
SFX 389 N 1
SFX 389 0 leştirileceği .
SFX 390 N 1
SFX 390 0 leşmesinde .
SFX 391 N 1
SFX 391 0 ılabilmelerini .
SFX 392 N 1
SFX 392 0 munu .
SFX 393 N 1
SFX 393 0 undakilerle .
SFX 395 N 1
SFX 395 0 leşmekten .
SFX 394 N 1
SFX 394 0 emeyişinin .
SFX 396 N 1
SFX 396 0 çinin .
SFX 397 N 1
SFX 397 0 layıcılığıyla .
SFX 398 N 1
SFX 398 0 cülüğüne .
SFX 399 N 1
SFX 399 0 masındaydı .
SFX 401 N 1
SFX 401 0 temeyeceğinin .
SFX 400 N 1
SFX 400 0 ılmışlığına .
SFX 402 N 1
SFX 402 0 mamalılar .
SFX 403 N 1
SFX 403 0 ılabilmelerine .
SFX 404 N 1
SFX 404 0 üldüm .
SFX 405 N 1
SFX 405 0 ınızı .
SFX 407 N 1
SFX 407 0 laştıramayacağım .
SFX 406 N 1
SFX 406 0 dırılamamıştır .
SFX 408 N 1
SFX 408 0 'daydık .
SFX 410 N 1
SFX 410 0 'daydım .
SFX 409 N 1
SFX 409 0 üldük .
SFX 411 N 1
SFX 411 0 lanamayışına .
SFX 412 N 1
SFX 412 0 lısıysa .
SFX 413 N 1
SFX 413 0 ilmeyecektir .
SFX 415 N 1
SFX 415 0 ülen .
SFX 414 N 1
SFX 414 0 tanlardan .
SFX 416 N 1
SFX 416 0 latabileceğine .
SFX 417 N 1
SFX 417 0 leştirmesiyle .
SFX 419 N 1
SFX 419 0 tilmesinde .
SFX 418 N 1
SFX 418 0 ştırsa .
SFX 421 N 1
SFX 421 0 muşsun .
SFX 420 N 1
SFX 420 0 'dekinden .
SFX 422 N 1
SFX 422 0 liklerindedir .
SFX 423 N 1
SFX 423 0 şanları .
SFX 425 N 1
SFX 425 0 latabileceğini .
SFX 424 N 1
SFX 424 0 ştığın .
SFX 426 N 1
SFX 426 0 tirdikten .
SFX 427 N 1
SFX 427 0 üyorum .
SFX 429 N 1
SFX 429 0 laştırmakta .
SFX 428 N 1
SFX 428 0 nileceği .
SFX 430 N 1
SFX 430 0 nundan .
SFX 432 N 1
SFX 432 0 ilemezler .
SFX 431 N 1
SFX 431 0 tilse .
SFX 433 N 1
SFX 433 0 ilişler .
SFX 436 N 1
SFX 436 0 ılabilmeleri .
SFX 435 N 1
SFX 435 0 leredir .
SFX 434 N 1
SFX 434 0 ümünüz .
SFX 438 N 1
SFX 438 0 tiyorum .
SFX 437 N 1
SFX 437 0 uştuğundan .
SFX 439 N 1
SFX 439 0 leyememenin .
SFX 440 N 1
SFX 440 0 ümünün .
SFX 442 N 1
SFX 442 0 ulabilecektir .
SFX 441 N 1
SFX 441 0 imiydi .
SFX 443 N 1
SFX 443 0 tiyoruz .
SFX 444 N 1
SFX 444 0 lendirmeyeceğini .
